Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB193.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, is amended by adding a 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728 section to read:Section 2422. Automated External Defibrillators in State Buildings.--(a) The Department of General Services shall install and maintain in each State building at least one functioning automated external defibrillator per State building, plus at least one additional automated external defibrillator for every 70,000 square feet , which shall be conspicuously placed and easily accessible.(b) Subsection (a) shall not apply to State buildings that are not regularly occupied or in use, such as:(1) Salt storage facilities.(2) Unoccupied storage buildings.(3) Maintenance sheds.(4) Temporary structures.(c) The Department of General Services may adopt guidelines as necessary to administer this section.(d) As used in this section: "Automated external defibrillator" means a portable device that uses electric shock to restore a stable heart rhythm to an individual in cardiac arrest."State building" means a building owned by the Commonwealth and maintained by the Department of General Services . Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0193PN0140 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223